Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5874.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-1-2. Definitions.
For the purposes this title, except as may otherwise be required by the context:
(1) “Election” means the filling of any public office or the determination of any public
question by vote of the electorate, and includes without limitation any state, town, or city office or
question, and any political party primary election for the nomination of any candidate for public
office; except that it shall not include a financial town meeting or a meeting to elect officers of a
fire, water, or sewer district;
(2) “General election” means an election held on the first Tuesday next after the first
Monday in November in even numbered years for the election of members of the general assembly
and/or for the election of general officers, and/or for the election of presidential electors for
president/vice-president of the United States;
(3) “General officer” means an officer designated as a general officer by chapter 2 of this
title;
(4) “Independent candidate” means a candidate who has no affiliation with any political
party;
(5) “Local board” means a town or city board of canvassers, board of canvassers and
registration, canvassing authority, or any other local board, commission, or officer empowered by

law to have custody of the permanent registration records;
(6) “Local election” means any election limited to the electorate of any city or town, or any
part, at which any city, town, ward, or district officers are to be chosen, or any elective meeting at
which a question is to be submitted to the voters of a city, town, or any subdivision of a city or
town, but it shall not include a financial town meeting;
(7) “Party member” means any person who is a member of a designated political party
pursuant to § 17-9.1-23;
(8) “Party voter” means any qualified voter who is eligible to vote at the primary election
of a political party;
(9) “Political party” or “party” means: (i) any political organization which, at the next
preceding general election for the election of general officers, nominated a candidate for governor,
and whose candidate for governor at the election polled at least five percent (5%) of the entire vote
cast in the state for governor, or (ii) any political organization which at the next preceding general
election for the election of a president of the United States nominated a candidate for president and
whose candidate for president at the election polled at least five percent (5%) of the entire vote cast
in the state for president, or (iii) any political organization which, on petition forms provided to the
chairperson of the organization by the state board of elections, obtains the signatures and addresses
of that number of registered qualified voters equal to five percent (5%) of the entire vote cast in the
state for governor or president in the immediately preceding general election. All the signatures
must be obtained no earlier than January 1 of the year in which the political organization desires to
place a candidate or candidates on any ballot as a “party” candidate. If the political organization
wishes to select its nominees in a primary election, the petitions, bearing the requisite number of
valid signatures, shall be presented to the appropriate local boards of canvassers no later than June
1 of the same year. If the petitions are validated by the local boards as containing the requisite
number of valid signatures, the political organization shall be deemed to be a political party for all
elections held during the year and may select its nominees in a primary election. If the political
organization does not wish to select its nominees in a primary election, then the petitions need not
be returned to local boards of canvassers until August 1 of the same year. An organization
qualifying as a political party through the petition process shall qualify as a political party only
during the year in which signatures are obtained unless the candidates for governor or president of
the United States of the party at a general election held in the year, shall receive five percent (5%)
of the vote as provided in this subdivision for either governor or president of the United States. If
the candidates do not receive five percent (5%) of the vote, the organization shall no longer qualify
as a political party unless and until it shall, in a subsequent year, once again qualify by the
LC002069 - Page 2 of 7

submission of petitions;
(10) “Polling place” means the room in which any election or elective meeting is
conducted;
(11) “Primary election” means any election to select the candidates of a political party;
(12) “Proposition” or “public question” means any question put to a referendum of the
electorate of the entire state or any part of it;
(13) “Qualified voter” means any person who is eligible to vote under the requirements of
age, residence, and citizenship prescribed by the state constitution and who is duly registered to
vote, or who is exempt from registration, pursuant to this title, and who is not otherwise disqualified
as a voter pursuant to law;
(14) “Special election” means any election other than a local election or primary election
which is not held on a general election day;
(15) "Specially qualified voter" means a person who is otherwise eligible to register as a
voter and whose present domicile is Rhode Island and who is confined in a correctional facility or
jail, except by reason of a felony conviction.
(15)(16) “State board” means the state board of elections constituted pursuant to this title;
(16)(17) “State election” means any election at which any presidential electors, senator or
representatives in congress, general officers of the state, or members of the general assembly are to
be chosen, or at which a public question or an amendment to the Constitution is submitted to the
electors of the state;
(17)(18) “State officer” means the governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
attorney general, general treasurer, state senator, and state representative;
(18)(19) “Vacancy in office” means the condition resulting from any failure to elect or
appoint an eligible and qualified person to public office, or the failure of any person duly elected
or appointed to qualify, or from the death, resignation, or removal of an incumbent prior to the
expiration of his or her term of office and where no fixed term is prescribed upon the death,
resignation, or removal;
(19)(20) “Voting list” means the complete list of all voters prepared from the information
contained in the original permanent registration records in the possession of the local board of
canvassers;
(20)(21) “Warden” includes “moderator” and vice versa;
(21)(22) Words importing the masculine gender shall include the feminine gender.
SECTION 2. Section 17-9.2-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-9.2 entitled "Rhode
Island Restoration of Voting Rights Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC002069 - Page 3 of 7

17-9.2-3. Restoration of voting rights.
(a) A person who has lost the right of suffrage under Article II, Section 1 of the Constitution
of Rhode Island because of such person’s incarceration upon a felony conviction shall be restored
the right to vote when that person is discharged from incarceration.
(b) Before accepting a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony, and before imposing a
felony sentence after trial, the court shall notify the defendant that conviction will result in loss of
the right to vote only if and for as long as the person is incarcerated and that voting rights are
restored upon discharge.
(c) The department of corrections shall act as a voter registration agency in accordance
with § 17-9.1-8. In this capacity, and as part of the release process leading to a person’s discharge
from a correctional facility, the department of corrections shall notify that person in writing that
voting rights will be restored, provide that person with a voter registration form and a declination
form, and offer that person assistance in filling out the appropriate form. Unless the registrant
refuses to permit it to do so, the department of corrections shall transmit the completed voter
registration form to the state board or local board where the registrant resides.
(d) The department of corrections shall, on or before the 15th day of each month, transmit
to the secretary of state two (2) lists. The first shall contain the following information about persons
convicted of a felony who, during the preceding period, have become ineligible to vote because of
their incarceration; the second shall contain the following information about persons convicted of
a felony who, during the preceding period, have become eligible to vote because of their discharge
from incarceration:
(1) name;
(2) date of birth;
(3) date of entry of judgment of conviction;
(4) description of offense;
(5) sentence.
(e) The secretary of state shall ensure that the statewide central voter registration is purged
of the names of persons who are ineligible to vote because of their incarceration upon a felony
conviction. The secretary of state shall likewise ensure that the names of persons who are eligible
and registered to vote following their discharge from incarceration are added to the statewide
central voter register in the same manner as all other names are added to that register.
(f) The secretary of state shall ensure that persons who have become eligible to vote
because of their discharge from incarceration face no continued barriers to registration or voting
resulting from their felony convictions.
LC002069 - Page 4 of 7

(g) The secretary of state shall develop and implement a program to educate attorneys,
judges, election officials, corrections officials, and members of the public about the requirements
of this section, ensuring that:
(1) Judges are informed of their obligation to notify criminal defendants of the potential
loss and restoration of their voting rights in accordance with subsection (b) hereof.
(2) The department of corrections is prepared to assist people with registration to vote in
anticipation of their discharge from incarceration, including by forwarding completed voter
registration forms to the state board or local board where the registrant resides.
(3) The language on voter registration forms makes clear that people who have been
disqualified from voting because of felony convictions regain the right to vote when they are
discharged from incarceration.
(4) The state department of corrections is prepared to transmit to the secretary of state the
information specified in subsection (d) hereof.
(5) Probation and parole officers are informed of the change in the law and are prepared to
notify probationers and parolees that their right to vote is restored.
(6) Accurate and complete information about the voting rights of people who have been
charged with or convicted of crimes, whether disfranchising or not, is made available through a
single publication to government officials and the public.
(7) All voting information shall be posted in a visible location at all correctional facility
buildings, where notices are customarily posted.
(h) Voting rights shall be restored to all Rhode Island residents who have been discharged
from incarceration or who were never incarcerated following felony convictions, whether they were
discharged or sentenced before or after the effective date of this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 17-20 of the General Laws entitled "Mail Ballots" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
17-20-1.2. Specially qualified voter.
A specially qualified voter, as defined in § 17-1-2, can request a ballot or mail ballot. The
mail ballot application shall provide a check box for a person applying for a mail ballot, to indicate
they are incarcerated, but not for a felony conviction. On the application, the applicant shall also
include the address at which they are either registered to vote or qualified to vote and the address
where they would like the mail ballot sent.
17-20-1.3. Jail voting coordinator.
The director of the department of corrections shall designate one of its employees the
"voting coordinator", who shall coordinate the education and facilitate the voting of eligible
LC002069 - Page 5 of 7

specially qualified voters. That designation shall take place immediately upon its creation and that
employee shall be continuously available to assist voting for specially qualified voters held at the
adult correctional institutions. That coordinator shall be responsible for ensuring that all the
department of corrections' responsibilities, pursuant to § 17-9.2-3, are fulfilled to ensure the right
to vote of a specially qualified voter. The coordinator shall prepare and submit to the secretary of
state an annual implementation plan detailing the department of corrections' compliance which
shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Identifying which staff members in each correctional facility building shall be
responsible for coordinating and providing voter information to incarcerated persons;
(2) Incorporating voter registration procedures;
(3) Methods for notifying persons incarcerated for misdemeanor convictions of their right
to continue voting, while incarcerated; and
(4) Ensuring access to mail ballot and ballot requests and submissions for incarcerated
individuals eligible to vote.
(b) The coordinator shall be responsible for all phases of the voting process for the specially
qualified voter, from registering voters, to the acquisition of the mail ballots and ballots, and to the
final return of the voted ballots to the board of elections.
17-20-1.4. Enforcement of inmate voting.
In accordance with the requirements of title 17, any incarcerated eligible voter who is
denied access to the voting process at any juncture, shall have the right to file a formal complaint
with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary
to ensure all aspects of this process are followed, as well as, to aid in the enforcement and protection
of voting rights for specially qualified voters incarcerated at the Rhode Island adult correctional
institutions.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002069
========
LC002069 - Page 6 of 7